California statutes. Commercial Code
(a) If a presentation is made that appears on its face strictly to comply with the terms and conditions of the letter of credit, but a required document is forged or materially fraudulent, or honor of the presentation would facilitate a material fraud by the beneficiary on the issuer or applicant:

(1) the issuer shall honor the presentation, if honor is demanded by (i) a nominated person who has given value in good faith and without notice of forgery or material fraud, (ii) a confirmer who has honored its confirmation in good faith, (iii) a holder in due course of a draft drawn under the letter of credit which was taken after acceptance by the issuer or nominated person, or (iv) an assignee of the issuer’s or nominated person’s deferred obligation that was taken for value and without notice of forgery or material fraud after the obligation was incurred by the issuer or nominated person; and

(2) the issuer, acting
 in good faith, may honor or dishonor the presentation in any other case.

(b) If an applicant claims that a required document is forged or materially fraudulent or that honor of the presentation would facilitate a material fraud by the beneficiary on the issuer or applicant, a court of competent jurisdiction may temporarily or permanently enjoin the issuer from honoring a presentation or grant similar relief against the issuer or other persons only if the court finds that:

(1) the relief is not prohibited under the law applicable to an accepted draft or deferred obligation incurred by the issuer;

(2) a beneficiary, issuer, or nominated person who may be adversely affected is adequately protected against loss that it may suffer because the relief is granted;

(3) all of the conditions to entitle a person to the relief under the law of this state have been met; and

(4) on the basis of the information submitted to the court, the applicant is more likely than not to succeed under its claim of forgery or material fraud and the person demanding honor does not qualify for protection under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 176, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5110.

(a) If its presentation is honored, the beneficiary warrants:

(1) to the issuer, any other person to whom presentation is made, and the applicant that there is no fraud or forgery of the kind described in subdivision (a) of Section 5109; and

(2) to the applicant that the drawing does not violate any agreement between the applicant and beneficiary or any other agreement intended by them to be augmented by the letter of credit.

(b) The warranties in subdivision (a) are in addition to warranties arising under Division 3 (commencing with Section 3101), Division 4 (commencing with Section 4101), Division 7 (commencing with Section 7101), and Division 8 (commencing with Section 8101) because of the presentation or transfer of documents covered by any of those divisions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 176, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5111.

(a) If an issuer wrongfully dishonors or repudiates its obligation to pay money under a letter of credit before presentation, the beneficiary, successor, or nominated person presenting on its own behalf may recover from the issuer the amount that is the subject of the dishonor or repudiation. If the issuer’s obligation under the letter of credit is not for the payment of money, the claimant may obtain specific performance or, at the claimant’s election, recover an amount equal to the value of performance from the issuer. In either case, the claimant may also recover incidental but not consequential damages. The claimant is not obligated to take action to avoid damages that might be due from the issuer under this subdivision. If, although not obligated to do so, the claimant avoids damages, the claimant’s recovery from the issuer must be reduced by the amount of damages avoided. The issuer has the burden of proving the amount of damages avoided. In the case of repudiation
 the claimant need not present any document.

(b) If an issuer wrongfully dishonors a draft or demand presented under a letter of credit or honors a draft or demand in breach of its obligation to the applicant, the applicant may recover damages resulting from the breach, including incidental but not consequential damages, less any amount saved as a result of the breach.

(c) If an adviser or nominated person other than a confirmer breaches an obligation under this article or an issuer breaches an obligation not covered in subdivision (a) or (b), a person to whom the obligation is owed may recover damages resulting from the breach, including incidental but not consequential damages, less any amount saved as a result of the breach. To the extent of the confirmation, a confirmer has the liability of an issuer specified in this subdivision and subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) An issuer, nominated person, or adviser who is found
 liable under subdivision (a), (b), or (c) shall pay interest on the amount owed thereunder from the date of wrongful dishonor or other appropriate date.

(e) Reasonable attorney’s fees and other expenses of litigation must be awarded to the prevailing party in an action in which a remedy is sought under this article.

(f) Damages that would otherwise be payable by a party for breach of an obligation under this article may be liquidated by agreement or undertaking, but only in an amount or by a formula that is reasonable in light of the harm anticipated.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 176, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5112.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 5113, unless a letter of credit provides that it is transferable, the right of a beneficiary to draw or otherwise demand performance under a letter of credit may not be transferred.

(b) Even if a letter of credit provides that it is transferable, the issuer may refuse to recognize or carry out a transfer if:

(1) the transfer would violate applicable law; or

(2) the transferor or transferee has failed to comply with any requirement stated in the letter of credit or any other requirement relating to transfer imposed by the issuer which is within the standard practice referred to in subdivision (e) of Section 5108 or is otherwise reasonable under the circumstances.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 176, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5113.

(a) A successor of a beneficiary may consent to amendments, sign and present documents, and receive payment or other items of value in the name of the beneficiary without disclosing its status as a successor.

(b) A successor of a beneficiary may consent to amendments, sign and present documents, and receive payment or other items of value in its own name as the disclosed successor of the beneficiary. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (e), an issuer shall recognize a disclosed successor of a beneficiary as beneficiary in full substitution for its predecessor upon compliance with the requirements for recognition by the issuer of a transfer of drawing rights by operation of law under the standard practice referred to in subdivision (e) of Section 5108 or, in the absence of such a practice, compliance with other reasonable procedures sufficient to protect the issuer.

(c) An issuer is not obliged to determine
 whether a purported successor is a successor of a beneficiary or whether the signature of a purported successor is genuine or authorized.

(d) Honor of a purported successor’s apparently complying presentation under subdivision (a) or (b) has the consequences specified in subdivision (i) of Section 5108 even if the purported successor is not the successor of a beneficiary. Documents signed in the name of the beneficiary or of a disclosed successor by a person who is neither the beneficiary nor the successor of the beneficiary are forged documents for the purposes of Section 5109.

(e) An issuer whose rights of reimbursement are not covered by subdivision (d) or substantially similar law and any confirmer or nominated person may decline to recognize a presentation under subdivision (b).

(f) A beneficiary whose name is changed after the issuance of a letter of credit has the same rights and obligations as a successor of a
 beneficiary under this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 176, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5114.

(a) In this section, “proceeds of a letter of credit” means the cash, check, accepted draft, or other item of value paid or delivered upon honor or giving of value by the issuer or any nominated person under the letter of credit. The term does not include a beneficiary’s drawing rights or documents presented by the beneficiary.

(b) A beneficiary may assign its right to part or all of the proceeds of a letter of credit. The beneficiary may do so before presentation as a present assignment of its right to receive proceeds contingent upon its compliance with the terms and conditions of the letter of credit.

(c) An issuer or nominated person need not recognize an assignment of proceeds of a letter of credit until it consents to the assignment.

(d) An issuer or nominated person has no obligation to give or withhold its consent to an assignment of proceeds of a letter of credit, but consent
 may not be unreasonably withheld if the assignee possesses and exhibits the letter of credit and presentation of the letter of credit is a condition to honor.

(e) Rights of a transferee beneficiary or nominated person are independent of the beneficiary’s assignment of the proceeds of a letter of credit and are superior to the assignee’s right to the proceeds.

(f) Neither the rights recognized by this section between an assignee and an issuer, transferee beneficiary, or nominated person nor the issuer’s or nominated person’s payment of proceeds to an assignee or third person affect the rights between the assignee and any person other than the issuer, transferee beneficiary, or nominated person. The mode of creating and perfecting a security interest in or granting an assignment of a beneficiary’s rights to proceeds is governed by Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) or other law. Against persons other than the issuer, transferee beneficiary, or
 nominated person, the rights and obligations arising upon the creation of a security interest or other assignment of a beneficiary’s right to proceeds and its perfection are governed by Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) or other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 176, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5115.

An action to enforce a right or obligation arising under this article must be commenced within one year after the expiration date of the relevant letter of credit or one year after the cause of action accrues, whichever occurs later. A cause of action accrues when the breach occurs, regardless of the aggrieved party’s lack of knowledge of the breach.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 176, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5116.

(a) The liability of an issuer, nominated person, or adviser for action or omission is governed by the law of the jurisdiction chosen by an agreement in the form of a record signed by the affected parties or by a provision in the person’s letter of credit, confirmation, or other undertaking. The jurisdiction whose law is chosen need not bear any relation to the transaction.

(b) Unless subdivision (a) applies, the liability of an issuer, nominated person, or adviser for action or omission is governed by the law of the jurisdiction in which the person is located. The person is considered to be located at the address indicated in the person’s
 undertaking. If more than one address is indicated, the person is considered to be located at the address from which the person’s undertaking was issued.

(c) For the purpose of jurisdiction, choice of law, and recognition of interbranch letters of credit, but not enforcement of a judgment, all branches of a bank are considered separate juridical entities and a bank is considered to be located at the place where its relevant branch is considered to be located under
 subdivision (d).

(d) A branch of a bank is considered to be located at the address indicated in the branch’s undertaking. If more than one address is indicated, the branch is considered to be located at the address from which the undertaking was issued.

(e) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, the liability of an issuer, nominated person, or adviser is governed by any rules of custom or practice, such as the Uniform Customs and Practice for Documentary Credits, to which the letter of credit, confirmation, or other undertaking is expressly made subject. If (i) this division would govern the liability of an issuer, nominated person, or adviser under subdivision (a) or (b), (ii) the relevant undertaking incorporates rules of custom or practice, and (iii)
 there is conflict between this division and those rules applied to that undertaking, those rules govern except to the extent of any conflict with the nonvariable provisions specified in subdivision (c) of Section 5103.

(f) If there is conflict between this division and Division 3 (commencing with Section 3101), Division 4 (commencing with Section 4101), or Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101), this division governs.

(g) The forum for settling disputes arising out of an undertaking within this division may be chosen in the manner and with the binding effect that governing law may be chosen in accordance with subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 210, Sec. 16.   (SB 95)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5117.

(a) An issuer that honors a beneficiary’s presentation is subrogated to the rights of the beneficiary to the same extent as if the issuer were a secondary obligor of the underlying obligation owed to the beneficiary and of the applicant to the same extent as if the issuer were the secondary obligor of the underlying obligation owed to the applicant.

(b) An applicant that reimburses an issuer is subrogated to the rights of the issuer against any beneficiary, presenter, or nominated person to the same extent as if the applicant were the secondary obligor of the obligations owed to the issuer and has the rights of subrogation of the issuer to the rights of the beneficiary stated in subdivision (a).

(c) A nominated person who pays or gives value against a draft or demand presented under a letter of credit is subrogated to the rights of:

(1) the issuer against the applicant to the same
 extent as if the nominated person were a secondary obligor of the obligation owed to the issuer by the applicant;

(2) the beneficiary to the same extent as if the nominated person were a secondary obligor of the underlying obligation owed to the beneficiary; and

(3) the applicant to the same extent as if the nominated person were a secondary obligor of the underlying obligation owed to the applicant.

(d) Notwithstanding any agreement or term to the contrary, the rights of subrogation stated in subdivisions (a) and (b) do not arise until the issuer honors the letter of credit or otherwise pays and the rights in subdivision (c) do not arise until the nominated person pays or otherwise gives value. Until then, the issuer, nominated person, and the applicant do not derive under this section present or prospective rights forming the basis of a claim, defense, or excuse.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 176, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5118.

(a) An issuer or nominated person has a security interest in a document presented under a letter of credit to the extent that the issuer or nominated person honors or gives value for the presentation.

(b) So long as and to the extent that an issuer or nominated person has not been reimbursed or has not otherwise recovered the value given with respect to a security interest in a document under subdivision (a), the security interest continues and is subject to Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101), subject to all of the following:

(1) A security agreement is not necessary to make the security interest enforceable under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of section 9203.

(2) If the document is presented in a medium other than a written or other tangible medium, the security interest is perfected.

(3) If the document is presented in a written or other tangible
 medium and is not a certificated security, chattel paper, a document of title, an instrument, or a letter of credit, the security interest is perfected and has priority over a conflicting security interest in the document so long as the debtor does not have possession of the document.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 29.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 6. BULK SALES [6101. - 6111.]

6101.

This division shall be known and may be cited as Uniform Commercial Code—Bulk Sales.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1191, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6102.

(a) In this division, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) “Assets” means the inventory and equipment that is the subject of a bulk sale and any tangible and intangible personal property used or held for use primarily in, or arising from, the seller’s business and sold in connection with that inventory and equipment, but the term does not include any of the following:

(i) Fixtures (paragraph (41) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102) other than readily removable factory and office machines.

(ii) The lessee’s interest in a lease of real property.

(iii) Property to the extent it is generally exempt from creditor process under nonbankruptcy law.

(2) “Auctioneer” means a person whom the seller engages to direct, conduct, control, or be responsible for a sale by auction.

(3) “Bulk sale” means either of
 the following:

(i) In the case of a sale by auction or a sale or series of sales conducted by a liquidator on the seller’s behalf, a sale or series of sales not in the ordinary course of the seller’s business of more than half of the seller’s inventory and equipment, as measured by a value on the date of the bulk-sale agreement.

(ii) In all other cases, a sale not in the ordinary course of the seller’s business of more than half the seller’s inventory and equipment, as measured by value on the date of the bulk-sale agreement.

(4) “Claim” means a right to payment from the seller, whether or not the right is reduced to judgment, liquidated, fixed, matured, disputed, secured, legal, or equitable. The term includes costs of collection and attorney’s fees only to the extent that the laws of this state permit the holder of the claim to recover them in an action against the obligor.

(5) “Claimant”
 means a person holding a claim incurred in the seller’s business other than any of the following:

(i) An unsecured and unmatured claim for employment compensation and benefits, including commissions and vacation, severance, and sick-leave pay.

(ii) A claim for injury to an individual or to property, or for breach of warranty, unless all of the following are satisfied:

(A) A right of action for the claim has accrued.

(B) The claim has been asserted against the seller.

(C) The seller knows the identity of the person asserting the claim and the basis upon which the person has asserted it.

(iii) A claim for taxes owing to a governmental unit, if both of the following are satisfied:

(A) A statute governing the enforcement of the claim permits or requires notice of the bulk sale to be given to the governmental unit
 in a manner other than by compliance with the requirements of this division.

(B) Notice is given in accordance with the statute.

(6) “Creditor” means a claimant or other person holding a claim.

(7) (i) “Date of the bulk sale” means either of the following:

(A) If the sale is by auction or is conducted by a liquidator on the seller’s behalf, the date on which more than 10 percent of the net proceeds is paid to or for the benefit of the seller.

(B) In all other cases, the later of the date on which either of the following occurs:

(I) More than 10 percent of the net contract price is paid to or for the benefit of the seller.

(II) More than 10 percent of the assets, as measured by value, are transferred to the buyer.

(ii) For purposes of this subdivision the
 following shall apply:

(A) Delivery of a negotiable instrument (subdivision (1) of Section 3104) to or for the benefit of the seller in exchange for assets constitutes payment of the contract price pro tanto.

(B) To the extent that the contract price is deposited in an escrow, the contract price is paid to or for the benefit of the seller when the seller acquires the unconditional right to receive the deposit or when the deposit is delivered to the seller or for the benefit of the seller, whichever is earlier.

(C) An asset is transferred when a person holding an unsecured claim can no longer obtain through judicial proceedings rights to the asset that are superior to those of the buyer arising as a result of the bulk sale. A person holding an unsecured claim can obtain those superior rights to a tangible asset at least until the buyer has an unconditional right, under the bulk-sale agreement, to possess the asset, and a
 person holding an unsecured claim can obtain those superior rights to an intangible asset at least until the buyer has an unconditional right, under the bulk-sale agreement, to use the asset.

(8) “Date of the bulk-sale agreement” means either of the following:

(i) In the case of a sale by auction or conducted by a liquidator (subparagraph (i) of paragraph (3)), the date on which the seller engages the auctioneer or liquidator.

(ii) In all other cases, the date on which a bulk-sale agreement becomes enforceable between the buyer and the seller.

(9) “Debt” means liability on a claim.

(10) “Liquidator” means a person who is regularly engaged in the business of disposing of assets for businesses contemplating liquidation or dissolution.

(11) “Net contract price” means the new consideration the buyer is obligated to pay for the assets less
 each of the following:

(i) The amount of any proceeds of the sale of an asset, to the extent the proceeds are applied in partial or total satisfaction of a debt secured by the asset.

(ii) The amount of any debt to the extent it is secured by a security interest or lien that is enforceable against the asset before and after it has been sold to a buyer. If a debt is secured by an asset and other property of the seller, the amount of the debt secured by a security interest or lien that is enforceable against the asset is determined by multiplying the debt by a fraction, the numerator of which is the value of the new consideration for the asset on the date of the bulk sale and the denominator of which is the value of all property securing the debt on the date of the bulk sale.

(12) “Net proceeds” means the new consideration received for assets sold at a sale by auction or a sale conducted by a liquidator on the seller’s behalf
 less each of the following:

(i) Commissions and reasonable expenses of the sale.

(ii) The amount of any proceeds of the sale of an asset, to the extent the proceeds are applied in partial or total satisfaction of a debt secured by the asset.

(iii) The amount of any debt to the extent it is secured by a security interest or lien that is enforceable against the asset before and after it has been sold to a buyer. If a debt is secured by an asset and other property of the seller, the amount of the debt secured by a security interest or lien that is enforceable against the asset is determined by multiplying the debt by a fraction, the numerator of which is the value of the new consideration for the asset on the date of the bulk sale and the denominator of which is the value of all property securing the debt on the date of the bulk sale.

(13) A sale is “in the ordinary course of the seller’s
 business” if the sale comports with usual or customary practices in the kind of business in which the seller is engaged or with the seller’s own usual or customary practices.

(14) “United States” includes its territories and possessions and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

(15) “Value” means fair market value.

(16) “Verified” means signed and sworn to or affirmed.

(b) The following definitions in other divisions apply to this division:

(1) “Buyer.” Paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) of Section 2103.

(2) “Equipment.” Paragraph (33) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102.

(3) “Inventory.” Paragraph (48) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102.

(4) “Sale.” Subdivision (1) of Section 2106.

(5) “Seller.” Paragraph (d) of subdivision (1) of Section 2103.

(c) In addition, Division 1 (commencing with Section 1101) contains general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

6103.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), this division applies to a bulk sale if both of the following are satisfied:

(1) The seller’s principal business is the sale of inventory from stock, including those who manufacture what they sell, or that of a restaurant owner.

(2) On the date of the bulk-sale agreement the seller is located in this state or, if the seller is located in a jurisdiction that is not a part of the United States, the seller’s major executive office in the United States is in this state.

(b) A seller is deemed to be located at its place of business. If a seller has more than one place of business, the seller is deemed located at its chief executive office.

(c) This division does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A transfer made to secure payment or performance of an obligation.

(2) A transfer of collateral to a secured party pursuant to Section 9609.

(3) A disposition of collateral pursuant to Section 9610.

(4) Retention of collateral pursuant to Section 9620.

(5) A sale of an asset encumbered by a security interest or lien if (i) all the proceeds of the sale are applied in partial or total satisfaction of the debt secured by the security interest or lien or (ii) the security interest or lien is enforceable against the asset after it has been sold to the buyer and the net contract price is zero.

(6) A general assignment for the benefit of creditors or to a subsequent transfer by the assignee.

(7) A sale by an executor, administrator, receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, debtor in possession, or any public officer under judicial process.

(8) A sale made in the course of judicial or administrative
 proceedings for the dissolution or reorganization of an organization.

(9) A sale to a buyer whose principal place of business is in the United States and who satisfies each of the following:

(i) Not earlier than 21 days before the date of the bulk sale, (A) obtains from the seller a verified and dated list of claimants of whom the seller has notice three days before the seller sends or delivers the list to the buyer or (B) conducts a reasonable inquiry to discover the claimants.

(ii) Assumes in full the debts owed to claimants of whom the buyer has knowledge on the date the buyer receives the list of claimants from the seller or on the date the buyer completes the reasonable inquiry, as the case may be.

(iii) Is not insolvent after the assumption.

(iv) Records and publishes notice of the assumption not later than 30 days after the date of the bulk sale in the manner
 provided in Section 6105.

(10) A sale to a buyer whose principal place of business is in the United States and who satisfies each of the following:

(i) Assumes in full the debts that were incurred in the seller’s business before the date of the bulk sale.

(ii) Is not insolvent after the assumption.

(iii) Records and publishes notice of the assumption not later than 30 days after the date of the bulk sale in the manner provided by Section 6105.

(11) A sale to a new organization that is organized to take over and continue the business of the seller and that has its principal place of business in the United States if each of the following conditions are satisfied:

(i) The buyer assumes in full the debts that were incurred in the seller’s business before the date of the bulk sale.

(ii) The seller receives nothing
 from the sale except an interest in the new organization that is subordinate to the claims against the organization arising from the assumption.

(iii) The buyer records and publishes notice of the assumption not later than 30 days after the date of the bulk sale in the manner provided in Section 6105. 

(12) A sale of assets having either of the following:

(i) A value, net of liens and security interests, of less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). If a debt is secured by assets and other property of the seller, the net value of the assets is determined by subtracting from their value an amount equal to the product of the debt multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the value of the assets on the date of the bulk sale and the denominator of which is the value of all property securing the debt on the date of the bulk sale.

(ii) A value of more than five million dollars ($5,000,000)
 on the date of the bulk-sale agreement.

(13) A sale required by, and made pursuant to, statute.

(14) A transfer of personal property, if the personal property is leased back to the transferor immediately following the transfer and either there has been compliance with subdivision (h) of Section 3440.1 of the Civil Code or the transfer is exempt under subdivision (k) of Section 3440.1 of the Civil Code.

(15) A transfer which is subject to and complies with Article 5 (commencing with Section 24070) of Chapter 6 of Division 9 of the Business and Professions Code, if the transferee records and publishes notice of the transfer at least 12 business days before the transfer is to be consummated in the manner provided in Section 6105 and the notice contains the information set forth in paragraphs (1) to (4) inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 6105.

(16) A transfer of goods in a warehouse where a
 warehouse receipt has been issued therefor by a warehouseman (Section 7102) and a copy of the receipt is kept at the principal place of business of the warehouseman and at the warehouse in which the goods are stored.

(d) The notice under subparagraph (iv) of paragraph (9) of subdivision (c) shall state each of the following:

(1) That a sale that may constitute a bulk sale has been or will be made.

(2) The date or prospective date of the bulk sale.

(3) The individual, partnership, or corporate names and the addresses of the seller and buyer.

(4) The address to which inquiries about the sale may be made, if different from the seller’s address.

(5) That the buyer has assumed or will assume in full the debts owed to claimants of whom the buyer has knowledge on the date the buyer receives the list of claimants from the seller or completes a
 reasonable inquiry to discover the claimants.

(e) The notice under subparagraph (iii) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (c) and subparagraph (iii) of paragraph (11) of subdivision (c) shall state each of the following:

(1) That a sale that may constitute a bulk sale has been or will be made.

(2) The date or prospective date of the bulk sale.

(3) The individual, partnership, or corporate names and the addresses of the seller and buyer.

(4) The address to which inquiries about the sale may be made, if different from the seller’s address.

(5) That the buyer has assumed or will assume the debts that were incurred in the seller’s business before the date of the bulk sale.

(f) For purposes of paragraph (12) of subdivision (c), the value of assets is presumed to be equal to the price the buyer agrees to pay for the
 assets. However, in a sale by auction or a sale conducted by a liquidator on the seller’s behalf, the value of assets is presumed to be the amount the auctioneer or liquidator reasonably estimates the assets will bring at auction or upon liquidation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 991, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 75 of Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

6104.

In a bulk sale as defined in subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 6102 the buyer shall do each of the following:

(a) Obtain from the seller a list of all business names and addresses used by the seller within three years before the date the list is sent or delivered to the buyer.

(b) Give notice of the bulk sale in accordance with Section 6105.

(c) Comply with Section 6106.2 if the bulk sale is within the scope of that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1191, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

6105.

(a) A notice that is governed by this section shall comply with each of the following:

(1) State that a bulk sale is about to be made.

(2) State the name and business address of the seller together with any other business name and address listed by the seller (subdivision (a) of Section 6104) and the name and business address of the buyer.

(3) State the location and general description of the assets.

(4) State the place and the anticipated date of the bulk sale.

(5) State whether or not the bulk sale is subject to Section 6106.2 and, if so subject, the matters required by subdivision (f) of Section 6106.2.

(b) At least 12 business days before the date of the bulk sale, a notice that is governed by this section shall be:

(1) Recorded in the office of the county recorder in the county or counties in this state in which the tangible assets are located and, if different, in the county in which the seller is located (paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 6103).

(2) Published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the public notice district in this state in which the tangible assets are located
 and in the public notice district, if different, in which the seller is located (paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 6103), if in either case there is one, and
 if there is none, then in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the public notice district is located. If the tangible assets are located in more than one public notice district in this state, the publication shall be in a newspaper of general circulation published in the public notice district in this state in which a greater portion of the tangible assets are located, on the date the notice is published, than in any other public notice district in this state and, if different, in the public notice district in which the seller is located (paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 6103).

(3) Delivered or sent by registered or certified mail to the county tax collector in the county or counties in this state in which the tangible assets are located. If delivered during the period from January 1 to May 7,
 inclusive, the notice shall be accompanied by a completed business property statement with respect to property involved in the bulk sale pursuant to Section 441 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) For the purposes of this section, publication of notice in a public notice district is governed by Chapter 1.1 (commencing with Section 6080) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(d) As used in this section, “business day” means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or day observed as a holiday by the state government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 703, Sec. 10.   (AB 2881)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6106.2.

(a) This section applies only to a bulk sale where the consideration is two million dollars ($2,000,000) or less and is substantially all cash or an obligation of the buyer to pay cash in the future to the seller or a combination thereof.

(b) Upon every bulk sale subject to this section except one made by sale at auction or a sale or series of sales conducted by a liquidator on the seller’s behalf, it is the duty of the buyer or, if the transaction is handled through an escrow, the escrow agent to apply the cash consideration in accordance with this section so far as necessary to pay those debts of the seller for which claims are due and payable on or before the date of the bulk sale and are received in writing on or prior to the date specified as the last date to file claims with the person designated in the notice to receive claims. This duty of the buyer or escrow agent runs to each claimant timely filing the claim.

(c) If the seller disputes whether a claim is due and payable on the date of the bulk sale or the amount of any claim, the buyer or escrow agent shall withhold from distribution an amount equal to (1) 125 percent of the first seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) of the claim, and (2) an amount equal to that portion of the claim in excess of the first seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500), or the pro rata amount under subdivision (b) of Section 6106.4, if applicable, and shall send a written notice to the claimant filing the claim on or before two business days after the distribution that the amount will be paid to the seller, or to the other claimants in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 6106.4, as the case may be, unless attached within 25 days from the mailing of the notice. Any portion of the amount withheld which is not attached by the claimant within that time shall be paid by the buyer or escrow agent to the seller, or to the other claimants in accordance with
 subdivision (b) of Section 6106.4 if they have not been paid in full. An attachment of any amount so withheld shall be limited in its effect to the amount withheld for the attaching claimant and shall give the attaching claimant no greater priority or rights with respect to its claim than the claimant would have had if the claim had not been disputed. For purposes of this subdivision, a claimant may obtain the issuance of an attachment for a claim which is less than five hundred dollars ($500) and which otherwise meets the requirements of Section 483.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure or which is a secured claim or lien of the type described in Section 483.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The remedy in this subdivision shall be in addition to any other remedies the claimant may have, including any right to attach the property intended to be transferred or any other property.

(d) If the cash consideration payable is not sufficient to pay all of the claims received in full,
 where no escrow has been established pursuant to Section 6106.4, the buyer shall follow the procedures specified in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 6106.4, and the immunity established by paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of that section shall apply to the buyer.
